District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.05

Transition.

For a period of 2 years following March 25, 1986, all references in this subchapter to supervision by licensed social workers shall be deemed to refer to supervision by persons meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether they are licensed in fact.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 805, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3308.5.